District of Columbia statutes.
50-504

Disclosure of rights.

(a)

The manufacturer, its agent, or authorized dealer shall provide written notification to the prospective consumer of any motor vehicle to be sold or registered in the District of the rights provided to the consumer by this chapter.

(b)

The Mayor shall issue rules and regulations prescribing the form and content of the notification required by this section.

(c)

Any agreement entered into by a consumer for the purchase of a motor vehicle which waives, limits, or disclaims the rights set forth in this chapter shall be void. These rights shall inure to a subsequent transferee of the motor vehicle.

History

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-162, § 5, 32 DCR 160

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1304.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority under D.C. Law 5-162, see Mayor’s Order 85-181, November 5, 1985.